Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE F. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 8105. BEACH ROAD MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8105.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "district" means the Beach Road Municipal Utility District.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 729 (H.B. 2019), Sec. 1.06, eff. April 1, 2007.

Sec. 8105.002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a conservation and reclamation district in Matagorda County created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 729 (H.B. 2019), Sec. 1.06, eff. April 1, 2007.

Sec. 8105.003. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS. (a) The district:

(1) is essential to accomplish the purposes of Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution; and

(2) is created to serve a public use and benefit.

(b) All land and other property included in the district will benefit from the works and projects to be accomplished by the district under powers conferred by Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 729 (H.B. 2019), Sec. 1.06, eff. April 1, 2007.

Sec. 8105.004. DISTRICT TERRITORY. (a) The district is composed of the territory described by Section 3, Chapter 959, Acts of the 73rd Legislature, Regular Session, 1993, as that territory may have been modified under:

(1) Subchapter H, Chapter 54, Water Code, before September 1, 1995;

(2) Subchapter J, Chapter 49, Water Code; or

(3) other law.

(b) The boundaries and field notes contained in Section 3, Chapter 959, Acts of the 73rd Legislature, Regular Session, 1993, form a closure. A mistake made in the field notes or in copying the field notes in the legislative process does not affect:

(1) the organization, existence, or validity of the district;

(2) the right of the district to impose taxes; or

(3) the legality or operation of the district or its governing body.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 729 (H.B. 2019), Sec. 1.06, eff. April 1, 2007.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec. 8105.051. DIRECTORS. (a) The district is governed by a board of five directors.

(b) Directors serve staggered four-year terms.

(c) A director must qualify to serve as director in the manner provided by Section 49.055, Water Code.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 729 (H.B. 2019), Sec. 1.06, eff. April 1, 2007.

Sec. 8105.052. ELECTION OF DIRECTORS. On the first Saturday in May of every even-numbered year, the district shall hold an election in the district to elect the appropriate number of directors.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 729 (H.B. 2019), Sec. 1.06, eff. April 1, 2007.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 8105.101. GENERAL RIGHTS, POWERS, PRIVILEGES, FUNCTIONS, AND DUTIES. (a) The district has the rights, powers, privileges, functions, and duties provided by general law, including Chapters 49, 50, and 54, Water Code, applicable to a municipal utility district created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

(b) The rights, powers, privileges, functions, and duties of the district are subject to the continuing right of supervision by this state exercised by and through the Texas Commission on Environmental Quality.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 729 (H.B. 2019), Sec. 1.06, eff. April 1, 2007.